Hawaii statutes.
§11-156 Certificate of election and
certificate of results, form. The chief election officer or county clerk
shall deliver certificates of election to the persons elected as determined
under section 11-155. The chief election officer or county clerk in county
elections shall issue certificates of results where a question has been voted
upon. Certificates of election shall be delivered only after the:

(1) Filing of reports in accordance with sections
11-331 and 11-333; and

(2) Payment of any fine assessed by the campaign
spending commission,

by the person elected in accordance with part XIII
and after the expiration of time for bringing an election contest. The
certificate of election shall be substantially in the following form:

CERTIFICATE
OF ELECTION

I,......................., chief election
officer (county clerk) of Hawaii (county), do hereby certify that
.................... was on the ..... day of .......... 20....., duly elected a
............... (name of office) for the ....................... district for a
term expiring on the ..... day of ...................., A.D. 20.....

Witness my hand this ..... day of
...................., A.D. 20.....

.....................................

Chief Election Officer
(County Clerk)

The certificate of results shall be
substantially in the following form:

CERTIFICATE
OF RESULTS

I, ............................, chief election
officer (county clerk) of Hawaii (county), do hereby certify that
.................. (question) was on the ..... day of ............... 20....,
duly adopted (rejected) by a majority of the votes cast.

.....................................

Chief Election Officer
(County Clerk)

If there is an election contest these
certificates shall be delivered only after a final determination in the contest
has been made and the time for an appeal has expired. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2;
am L 1986, c 305, §4; am L 2012, c 34, §1; am L 2014, c 139, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next